District of Columbia statutes.
5-1136

Repealed

Liability of Board members.

Repealed.

Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-158, § 7, 27 DCR 5127
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 803(a), 42 DCR 3684
1981 Ed., § 4-906.
For effective date of repeal of §§ 5-1131 to 5-1140, see Historical and Statutory Notes following § 5-1131.